Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 2
COLORADO SUPPLEMENTAL SECURITY INCOME ACT

26-2-201. Short title.

This part 2 shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Supplemental Security Income Act".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 891, § 12, effective July 28.

26-2-202. Legislative declaration.

It is the intent of this part 2 to implement a state supplementation program pursuant to Title XVI of the social security act. It is the object and purpose of this part 2 to promote the public health and welfare of individuals who are residents of Colorado and whose need results from age, blindness, or disability with assistance and services to assist such individuals to attain or retain their capabilities for independence, self-care, and self-support.

The state supplementation shall be accomplished by providing mandatory assistance, as defined in this part 2, where required and by providing optional supplementation in accordance with Title XVI of the social security act and regulations adopted by the state board, within available appropriations. Title XVI of the social security act currently permits, in the determination of eligibility for benefits under that title, the disregard of certain payments which a Title XVI recipient receives from a state or a political subdivision of a state. Those persons receiving benefits under Title XVI of the social security act who also meet the eligibility requirements fixed under part 1 of this article may receive a state supplement to their Title XVI benefits in the form of benefits provided under such part 1.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 891, § 12, effective July 28.

26-2-203. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"December 1973 income" means the amount of assistance payment which an individual received for December, 1973, plus income used in computing such payment, according to the state plan approved by the United States department of health, education, and welfare for the state of Colorado as in effect for June, 1973.

"Mandatory minimum state supplementation" means minimum payments required by the social security act to be made by the state to maintain certain former adult assistance recipients at their December 1973 income level.

"Optional state supplement" means cash payments or special needs or both which are paid or provided to or on behalf of a supplemental security income recipient pursuant to the rules and regulations of the state board pursuant to part 1 of this article.

"Special needs" means an amount to be paid to or on behalf of aged, blind, or disabled individuals in specified circumstances, as determined by the state board, for specified individualized needs.

"SSI benefits" means cash payments made by the federal government to eligible aged, blind, or disabled individuals pursuant to Title XVI of the social security act.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 891, § 12, effective July 28.

26-2-204. Mandatory minimum state supplementation of SSI benefits.

The state department, with the approval of the state board, is authorized to enter into an agreement with the secretary of the United States department of health, education, and welfare whereby the state department will provide to qualified individuals residing in the state, within available appropriations, mandatory minimum state supplementation of SSI benefits in accordance with the requirements of Title XVI of the social security act and rules and regulations of the state department.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 892, § 12, effective July 28.

26-2-205. Optional state supplementation.

The state department is authorized to adopt rules and regulations for the provision of optional state supplementation to recipients of SSI benefits residing in the state, within available appropriations, in accordance with Title XVI of the social security act and this part 2. Such benefits may be provided pursuant to part 1 of this article if the individual meets the eligibility requirements established under such part 1. SSI benefits received must be considered as income in determining eligibility under part 1 of this article. Eligibility for and the amount of such payments shall be fixed by the state board. If the federal government makes a final determination that any such payments must be considered as income in determining eligibility for SSI benefits, the state board shall terminate such payments.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 892, § 12, effective July 28.

26-2-206. Interim assistance.

The state department, with the approval of the state board and in accordance with the rules and regulations of the state department, is authorized to enter into an agreement with the secretary of the United States department of health, education, and welfare for implementation of arrangements for interim assistance as authorized by Title XVI of the social security act.

Payment of legal, professional, or other fees by a recipient of public assistance who is seeking supplemental security income benefits shall be made in accordance with the policies and procedures of the social security act.

Neither the state department nor any county shall pay any portion of costs associated with obtaining supplemental security income, including any legal, professional, or other fees paid by a recipient of public assistance in seeking supplemental security income benefits or any other federal benefit. The interim assistance reimbursement payment authorized under this section shall be used to reimburse the state aid to the needy disabled program, described in section 26-2-111 (4), for benefits paid to the recipient as interim assistance in accordance with the agreement between the state department and the social security administration. Any moneys received by a county in excess of the interim assistance paid by the state department and any county on behalf of the recipient shall be paid to the recipient.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 892, § 12, effective July 28.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 223, § 1, effective March 26.

26-2-207. Administration.

The provisions of article 1 of this title and, where not inconsistent with this part 2, the provisions of part 1 of this article shall apply to state supplementation under this part 2.

The state department, with the approval of the state board and in accordance with the rules and regulations of the state department, may enter into agreements with the secretary of the United States department of health, education, and welfare to assist in the administration of Title XVI of the social security act and this part 2.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 892, § 12, effective July 28.

26-2-208. Federal requirements.

Nothing in this part 2 shall be construed to prevent the state department from complying with federal requirements expressly provided by federal law in order for the state of Colorado to qualify for federal funds under the social security act.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 892, § 12, effective July 28.

26-2-209. Limitations.

All benefits granted under this part 2 shall be granted and held subject to the provisions of any amending or repealing law that may be passed after July 1, 1975, and no recipient shall have any claim for compensation or otherwise by reason of his supplementation benefits being affected in any way by any amending or repealing law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part added, p. 892, § 12, effective July 28.

26-2-210. State supplemental security income stabilization fund - creation.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the state supplemental security income stabilization fund, referred to in this section as the "stabilization fund", for the purpose of stabilizing the source of funding required to meet the federal requirements for maintenance of effort for the state-funded supplement to persons receiving SSI benefits. The stabilization fund shall consist of any excess moneys recovered due to overpayment of recipients, including regular, fraud, and interim assistance reimbursement recoveries, and any appropriations made to the stabilization fund by the general assembly. The moneys in the stabilization fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the state department to be expended on programs that count toward the maintenance of effort for the state supplemental security income as specified in the state plan when the state department determines that the state is at risk of not meeting the federal maintenance of effort for that calendar year. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the stabilization fund shall be credited to the stabilization fund. At the end of any fiscal year, an amount not exceeding twenty percent of the total appropriation for the applicable fiscal year in the annual general appropriations bill for the program for aid to the needy disabled shall remain in the stabilization fund as a continuous appropriation to be used to meet the state's maintenance of effort requirements under this part 2, and any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the stabilization fund at the end of any fiscal year in excess of an amount equal to twenty percent of the total appropriation for the applicable fiscal year in the annual general appropriations bill for the program for aid to the needy disabled shall revert to the general fund.

The state department shall submit a report to the joint budget committee by February 15 of each year. The report shall indicate whether expenditures were made from the stabilization fund, the aggregate monthly amount of any expenditures, and the particular programs for which the expenditures were made.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, on June 30, 2020, the state treasurer shall transfer one million eight hundred eighty-seven thousand one hundred sixteen dollars from the stabilization fund to the general fund.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1215), ch. 70, p. 239, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-012), ch. 248, p. 961, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2020:

(3) added, (HB 20-1381), ch. 171, p. 786, § 5, effective June 29.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-012, see section 1 of chapter 248, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.